Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1717
Bond for cost, appeal, supersedeas, injunction, or attachment; county and employees; exemption.

No bond for cost, appeal, supersedeas, injunction, or attachment shall be required of any county or of any officer, board, head of any board, department, head of any department, commission, head of any commission, agent, or employee of any county in any proceeding or court action in which the county or any officer, board, head of any board, department, head of any department, commission, head of any commission, agent, or employee of the county is a party litigant in its, his, or her official capacity.

Laws 1989, LB 556, § 1.